Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 14.2 Transportation Network Company Services

39-14.2-1.
Definitions.

Terms in this chapter shall be construed as follows, unless another meaning is expressed or is clearly apparent from the language or context:

“Active TNC driver” means a TNC driver who has provided at least one prearranged ride through the TNC in the preceding ninety (90) days.

“Administrator” means the administrator of the division of public utilities and carriers.

“Digital network” means any online-enabled technology application service, website, or system offered or utilized by a transportation network company that enables the prearrangement of rider transportation with transportation network company drivers.

“Division” means the division of public utilities and carriers.

“Partner” or “partnering” means the act of a TNC operator agreeing to the terms and conditions set forth by a TNC for access to the TNC’s digital network for the purpose of being connected to potential TNC riders seeking TNC services.

“Person” means and includes any individual, partnership, corporation, or other association of individuals.

“Personal vehicle” means a vehicle that is used by a transportation network company driver and is:

Designed to hold no more than seven (7) individuals, including the driver;

Owned, leased, or otherwise authorized for use by the individual; and

Not a jitney, as defined in §

39-13-1

; a taxicab or limited public motor vehicle, as defined in §

39-14-1

; a public motor vehicle, as defined in §

39-14.1-1

; or a common carrier as defined in this title.

“Transportation network company” or “TNC” means an entity licensed by the division pursuant to this chapter that uses a digital network to connect transportation network company riders to transportation network operators who provide prearranged rides. A transportation network company shall not be deemed to control, direct, or manage the personal vehicles or transportation network company drivers that connect to its digital network, except where agreed to by written contract.

“Transportation network company affiliation placard” or “TNC affiliation placard” means a recognizable logo or decal issued by the TNC used to identify personal vehicles whenever the vehicle is available to provide, or is providing, TNC services.

“Transportation network company operator” or “TNC operator” or “TNC driver” means an individual who:

Receives connections to potential riders and related services from a transportation network company in exchange for payment of a fee to the transportation network company; and

Uses a personal vehicle to offer or provide a prearranged ride to TNC riders upon connection through a digital network controlled by a transportation network company in exchange for compensation or payment of a fee.

“Transportation network company rider” or “TNC rider” means a person who uses a transportation network company’s digital network to connect with a transportation network driver who provides prearranged rides to the rider in the driver’s personal vehicle between points chosen by the rider.

“Transportation network company services” or “prearranged ride” means the provision of transportation by a TNC driver to a TNC rider beginning when a TNC driver accepts a TNC rider’s request for a ride made only through a digital network controlled by a transportation network company (TNC), continuing while the TNC driver transports the requesting TNC rider(s), and ending when the last requesting TNC rider(s) departs from the personal vehicle. TNC services and prearranged rides do not include transportation provided using a jitney, as defined in §

39-13-1

; a taxicab or limited public motor vehicle, as defined in §

39-14-1

; a public motor vehicle, as defined in §

39-14.1-1

; a common carrier as defined in this title; or a regional transportation provider. TNC services and prearranged rides do not include a shared-expense carpool or vanpool arrangement or service.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 8.

39-14.2-2.
Not other carriers.

TNCs or TNC drivers are not common carriers, as defined in this title; jitneys, as defined in §

39-13-1

; taxicabs or limited public motor vehicles, as defined in §

39-14-1

; or public motor vehicles, as defined in §

39-14.1-1

.

A TNC driver shall not be required to register the vehicle the driver uses for prearranged rides as a commercial or for-hire vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1.

39-14.2-3.
Powers of division.

Every person operating a licensed transportation network company or operating as a licensed transportation network company operator is declared to be subject to the jurisdiction of the division of public utilities and carriers. The division may prescribe rules and regulations consistent with this chapter that are necessary to ensure adequate, safe, and compliant service under this chapter. The division is further authorized to conduct investigations into complaints; conduct investigations initiated on its own; and to hold hearings as it deems necessary to fulfill the proper administration of this chapter.

The division shall require transportation network companies to establish and implement a written policy capping dynamic pricing during disasters and relevant states of emergency and make this policy available on its website or application.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1.

39-14.2-4.
Audit procedures.

For the sole purpose of verifying that a TNC is in compliance with the requirements of this chapter and no more often than annually, the division shall have the right to visually inspect a sample of records that the TNC is required to maintain. The sample shall be chosen randomly by the division in a manner agreeable to both parties. The audit shall take place at a mutually agreed upon location in Rhode Island. Any record furnished to the division may exclude information that would tend to identify specific drivers or riders.

In addition to the provisions of subsection (a), in response to a specific complaint against any TNC driver, or upon reasonable suspicion that a violation of this chapter has occurred, the division is authorized to inspect records held by the TNC that are necessary to investigate and resolve the complaint. Any record furnished to the division may exclude information that would tend to identify specific drivers or riders, unless the identity of a driver or rider is relevant to the complaint.

Any records inspected by the division under this chapter shall be held confidential by the division and are not subject to disclosure to a third party by the division without prior written consent of the TNC, and are exempt from disclosure under the Rhode Island Access to Public Records Act, chapter 2 of title 38. Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the applicability of any other exemptions under the Rhode Island Access to Public Records Act, chapter 2 of title 38.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 8.

39-14.2-5.
Permit required of transportation network company.

No person shall operate a TNC in the state until that person shall have applied for and obtained a permit from the division; provided, that any transportation network company operating in the state before the effective date of this chapter [Nov. 3, 2016] may continue to operate in the state until the division creates a permit process as required pursuant to this section, and provides a reasonable period in which to apply and obtain a permit.

No application for a permit may be granted or renewed unless the division determines that, at a minimum, each applicant for a permit has verified the following:

That the applicant has a sufficient oversight process in place to ensure that every vehicle providing transportation network services through its digital network possesses adequate insurance coverage;

That the applicant has submitted to the division information on the internal or third-party background check entity and its data-collection process to ensure compliance with the requirements established in §

39-14.2-7(b)

and (c). The required information and the process for submitting such information shall be established through regulations promulgated by the division;

That the applicant has sufficient oversight processes in place to ensure that each TNC driver using the applicant’s digital network:

Has submitted to a background check conducted by the applicant that includes a review of local and national criminal records, sex offender records, and driving records associated with each driver; and

Submitted the application requirement of §

39-14.2-7(b)

(1).

The application fee and annual renewal fee shall be five thousand dollars ($5,000) for a TNC with fewer than 50 active TNC drivers; ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for a TNC with at least 50, but fewer than 200, active TNC drivers; and thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for a TNC with at least 200 active TNC drivers at the time of application or permit renewal and only after the division satisfactorily determines that the applicant meets the requirements for a TNC set forth in this chapter, and as set forth in any rules or regulations promulgated in accordance with §

39-14.2-3

.

All permits issued under this section shall be renewed before the close of business on December 31 of each calendar year. All revenue collected under this section shall be deposited into the transportation network services reserve account as provided in §

39-14.2-6

.

Permits issued under this chapter shall not be transferred without the consent of the division.

The sale or other transfer of a controlling percentage of the capital stock or membership interests of a TNC, whether by merger, stock sale, or otherwise, or the sale or transfer of more than fifty percent (50%) of the value of the assets of a TNC, shall be deemed a change of control, not a transfer, and shall not be subject to the restrictions in subsection (d). The phrase “controlling percentage” means the ownership of, and the right to vote, stock or interests possessing more than fifty percent (50%) of the total, combined voting power of all classes of TNC’s capital stock or interests issued, outstanding, and entitled to vote for the election of directors.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1.

39-14.2-6.
Transportation network services administration reserve account — Recovery of administrative and enforcement expenses.

There is hereby created a fund to be known as the transportation network services administration reserve account, a restricted-use account within the division of public utilities and carriers. The account, hereinafter referred to as the “fund,” shall be used for the purpose of providing the financial means for the division to fulfill its regulatory oversight of this chapter; enforcing relevant sections of this chapter; and any other administrative expense deemed necessary by the administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1.

39-14.2-7.
Transportation network company operators or TNC operators, TNC drivers.

No individual shall provide TNC services or transport TNC riders in a personal vehicle until the individual shall have first submitted to required, periodic background checks conducted through the TNC in accordance with subsection (b).

Prior to permitting an individual to accept trip requests through its digital network, a TNC shall:

Require the individual to submit an application to the TNC. The application shall include the individual’s name; address; age; driver’s license number; photocopy or electronic copy of the driver’s license; motor-vehicle registration for the personal vehicle that the individual intends to use to provide prearranged rides; automobile liability insurance; and other information as may be required by the TNC;

Conduct, or have a third party accredited by the National Association of Professional Background Screeners conduct, a local and national criminal background check for each applicant that shall include:

A multistate/multi-jurisdictional criminal records locator or other similar commercial nationwide database with validation (primary source search); and

The Dru Sjodin National Sex Offender Public Website; and

Obtain and review, or have a third party obtain and review, a driving history research report for such driving applicant.

The TNC shall certify that the required background checks verify that the applicant meets the following criteria:

Has not had more than three (3) moving violations in the prior three-year (3) period, or one of the following major violations in the prior three-year (3) period:

Attempting to evade the police;

Reckless driving;

Driving on a suspended license; or

Revoked license.

Has not, in the past seven (7) years, been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to any of the following:

Driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol;

Felony fraud;

Sexual offenses;

Use of a motor vehicle to commit a felony;

Felony crimes involving property damage and/or theft; or

Acts of violence or felony acts of terror;

Is not a match in the Dru Sjodin National Sex Offender Public Website;

Possesses a valid driver’s license;

Possesses proof of registration for the motor vehicle to be used to provide prearranged rides or TNC services;

Possesses proof of automobile liability insurance, that satisfies the financial-responsibility requirement for a motor vehicle under §

31-47-2(13)(i)(A)

, for the motor vehicle(s) to be used to provide prearranged rides or TNC services; and

Is at least nineteen (19) years of age.

TNC operators may be affiliated with or may “partner” with more than one properly permitted transportation network company to provide TNC services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 8.

39-14.2-8.
Solicitation and acceptance of TNC service requests.

TNC operators shall be strictly prohibited from soliciting or accepting so-called “street hails.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1.

39-14.2-9.
Vehicles to be utilized to provide TNC services.

TNC operators may utilize a personal vehicle to provide licensed TNC services, provided:

The vehicle is owned by, leased to, or otherwise authorized by the legal owner/lessee to be used by a TNC operator to provide TNC services: and

The vehicle is no older than fifteen (15) model years old and is designed to hold no more than seven (7) individuals, including the driver; and

The vehicle meets the vehicle-safety inspection requirements for a private motor vehicle in Rhode Island, or the state in which the vehicle is registered, performed by a facility licensed by the state to conduct such inspections, and shall display an according inspection sticker on the vehicle’s windshield if required to do so by applicable law; and

The vehicle shall have met or surpassed sanitary/acceptability standards established by the TNC with which the TNC operator has “partnered”; and

It shall be prohibited for a TNC operator to connect to a TNC’s digital network for the purpose of accepting solicitations and providing TNC services in a personal vehicle other than a personal vehicle that the TNC operator has registered with the TNC pursuant to §

39-14.2-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1.

39-14.2-10.
Electronic identification of TNC vehicles and drivers by TNC.

The TNC’s digital network shall display to passengers requesting TNC services a picture of the TNC driver and the license plate number of the vehicle to be used to provide the requested services before the passenger enters the TNC operator’s vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1.

39-14.2-11.
Transportation network affiliation placards required.

No personal vehicle shall be utilized to provide TNC services until the TNC operator intending to utilize a personal vehicle to provide such TNC services has first registered the vehicle with the TNC and the owner has been issued by the TNC a transportation network affiliation placard.

TNC operators shall be required to display the transportation network affiliation placard in a conspicuous place on the personal vehicle at all times when connected to a TNC’s digital network.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1.

39-14.2-12.
Fare charged for TNC services provided.

On behalf of a TNC operator, a TNC may charge a fare for the transportation services provided to the passengers; provided that, if a fare is charged, the TNC shall disclose to the riders the fare or fare calculation method on its website or within the digital network.

The TNC shall provide the potential rider with the option to receive a reasonably accurate estimate of the expected total fare before the passenger enters the TNC operator’s personal vehicle.

Fares for TNC services shall not be paid in cash. Any payment for TNC services shall be made only electronically using the TNC’s digital network or other application.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1.

39-14.2-13.
Rights of TNC riders.

Within a reasonable period of time following the completion of a TNC service trip, a TNC shall transmit an electronic receipt to the rider that lists:

The origin and destination of the trip;

The total time and distance of the trip; and

An itemization of the total fare paid, including any additional surcharges.

A TNC shall be prohibited from disclosing a TNC rider’s personally identifiable information to a third party, unless:

Disclosure is pursuant to the publicly disclosed terms of the TNC’s privacy policy or another consent mechanism to which the rider consents;

Disclosure is required by a legal obligation; or

Disclosure is required to protect or defend the terms of use of the service or to investigate violations of those terms. In addition to the foregoing, a TNC shall be permitted to share a rider’s name and/or telephone number with the TNC operator providing prearranged rides or TNC services to such passenger in order to facilitate correct identification of the rider by the TNC operator or to facilitate communication between those two (2) parties.

A TNC rider shall be afforded all of the anti-discrimination protections provided in §

39-14.2-21

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1.

39-14.2-14.
Proof of financial responsibility of transportation network companies.

On or before ninety (90) days after the effective date of this chapter and thereafter, TNC drivers, or a TNC on the driver’s behalf, shall maintain primary automobile insurance that:

Recognizes that the driver is a transportation network company driver or otherwise uses a vehicle to transport riders for compensation and covers the driver:

While the driver is logged on to the transportation network company’s digital network; or

While the driver is engaged in a prearranged ride or providing transportation network company services.

The following automobile liability insurance requirements shall apply during the time a TNC driver is logged into the TNC’s digital network and available to receive requests for transportation but is not providing prearranged rides:

Primary automobile liability insurance in the amount of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for death and bodily injury per person, one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for death and bodily injury per incident, and twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for property damage.

Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage to the extent required by §

27-7-2.1

.

The coverage requirements of this subsection (b) may be satisfied by any of the following:

Automobile insurance maintained by the TNC driver; or

Automobile insurance maintained by the TNC; or

Any combination of subsections (b)(3)(i) and (b)(3)(ii).

The following automobile liability insurance requirements shall apply while a TNC driver is providing prearranged rides:

Primary automobile liability insurance that provides at least one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) for death, bodily injury, and property damage;

Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage to the extent required by §

27-7-2.1

;

The coverage requirements of this subsection (c) may be satisfied by any of the following:

Automobile liability insurance maintained by the TNC driver; or

Automobile liability insurance maintained by the TNC; or

Any combination of subsections (c)(3)(i) and (c)(3)(ii).

If insurance maintained by a TNC driver to fulfill the insurance requirements of subsections (b) and (c) of this section has lapsed or does not provide the required coverage, insurance maintained by a TNC shall provide the coverage required by this section beginning with the first dollar of a claim and the insurer shall have the duty to defend such claim.

Coverage under an automobile insurance policy maintained by the transportation network company shall not be dependent on a personal automobile insurer first denying a claim nor shall a personal automobile insurance policy be required to first deny a claim.

Insurance required by this section may be placed with an insurer licensed under §

27-2.4-1

et seq., or with a surplus lines insurer eligible under §

27-3-40

that has a credit rating of no less than “A-” from A.M. Best, or “A” from Demotech, or similar rating from another rating agency recognized by the Rhode Island insurance division.

Insurance required by this section shall be deemed to satisfy the financial responsibility requirement for a motor vehicle under §

31-47-2(13)(i)(A)

.

A TNC driver shall carry physical or electronic proof of coverage satisfying subsections (b) and (c) with him or her at all times during his or her use of a vehicle in connection with a TNC’s digital network. In the event of an accident, a TNC driver shall provide this insurance coverage information to the directly interested parties, automobile insurers, and investigating police officers, upon request pursuant to §

31-47-2(15)

. Upon such request, a TNC driver shall also disclose to directly interested parties, automobile insurers, and investigating police officers, whether they were logged on to the TNC’s digital network or providing prearranged rides at the time of an accident.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1.

39-14.2-15.
TNC and insurer disclosure requirements.

The TNC shall disclose, in writing, to TNC drivers the following before they are allowed to accept a request for prearranged rides on the TNC’s digital network:

The insurance coverage, including the types of coverage and the limits for each coverage, that the TNC provides while the TNC driver uses a personal vehicle in connection with a TNC’s digital network; and

That the TNC driver’s own automobile insurance policy might not provide any coverage while the driver is logged on to the TNC’s digital network and is available to receive transportation requests or is engaged in a prearranged ride, depending on its terms.

Insurers that write automobile liability insurance in Rhode Island may exclude any and all coverage afforded under the policy issued to an owner or operator of a personal vehicle for any loss or injury that occurs while a TNC driver is logged on to a TNC’s digital network or while a TNC driver provides a prearranged ride. This right to exclude all coverage may apply to any coverage included in an automobile insurance policy including, but not limited to:

Liability coverage for bodily injury and property damage;

Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage;

Medical payments coverage;

Comprehensive physical damage coverage;

Collision physical damage coverage; and

Personal injury protection.

Such exclusions shall apply notwithstanding any requirement under §

31-47-2(13)(i)(A)

. Nothing in this section shall be construed as to require an insurer to use any particular policy language or reference to this section in order to exclude any and all coverage for any loss or injury that occurs while a driver is logged on to a TNC’s digital network or while a TNC driver provides a prearranged ride.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to preclude an insurer from providing primary or excess coverage by contract or endorsement for the TNC driver’s personal vehicle while the TNC driver is logged on to a digital network or while the driver is engaged in a prearranged ride.

Automobile insurers that exclude the coverage described in §

39-14.2-14(b)

and (c) shall have no duty to defend or indemnify any claim expressly excluded thereunder. Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to invalidate or limit an exclusion contained in a policy including any policy in use or approved for use in Rhode Island prior to the enactment of this chapter that excludes coverage for vehicles used to carry persons or property for a charge or available for hire by the public. An automobile insurer that defends or indemnifies a claim against a driver that is excluded under the terms of its policy, shall have a right of contribution against other insurers that provide automobile insurance to the same driver in satisfaction of the coverage requirements of §

39-14.2-14(b)

and (c) at the time of loss.

In a claims coverage investigation, a TNC shall immediately provide upon request by directly involved parties or any insurer of the transportation network company driver, if applicable, the precise times that a transportation network company driver logged on and off of the TNC’s digital network in the twelve-hour (12) periods immediately preceding and immediately following the accident. Any insurer providing coverage under §

39-14.2-14(b)

and (c) shall disclose upon request by any other such insurer involved in the particular claim, the applicable coverage, exclusions, and limits provided under any automobile insurance maintained under §

39-14.2-14(b)

and (c).

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1.

39-14.2-16.
Limitations on TNCs.

TNC drivers shall be independent contractors and not employees of the TNC if they are determined to meet federal and state law and regulation relating to independent contractors, including, but not limited to, 26 U.S.C. § 3401(a), 26 U.S.C. § 3402(a)(1), §§

28-29-17.1

and

28-42-7

, and the TNC and TNC driver agree in writing that the TNC driver is an independent contractor of the TNC.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1.

39-14.2-17.
Alcohol/drug use strictly prohibited.

The TNC shall implement a zero-tolerance policy regarding a TNC driver’s activities while accessing the TNC’s digital network. The zero-tolerance policy shall address the use of drugs or alcohol while a TNC driver is providing prearranged rides or is logged into the TNC’s digital network but is not providing prearranged rides, and the TNC shall provide notice of this policy on its website or mobile application, as well as procedures to report a complaint about a TNC driver with whom a rider was matched and whom the rider reasonably suspects was under the influence of drugs or alcohol during the course of the trip.

TNCs shall provide notice on their website or digital network how a rider may report a complaint about a TNC operator who the passenger reasonably suspects was under the influence of drugs or alcohol during the course of a recently completed prearranged trip.

Upon receipt of such a rider complaint alleging a violation of the zero tolerance policy, the TNC shall suspend such TNC operator’s access to the digital network as soon as possible and shall conduct an investigation into the reported incident. The suspension of access shall last until the investigation is complete. The TNC shall maintain records relevant to the enforcement of this requirement for a period of at least two (2) years from the date that a rider complaint is received by the TNC.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1.

39-14.2-18.
Controlling authority.

All provisions of this chapter, with the exception of §

39-14.2-14

, are hereby declared to be the sole jurisdiction of the division; §

39-14.2-14

is hereby declared to be the sole jurisdiction of the division and the department of business regulation. Cities, towns, and other local entities in the state are expressly prohibited from:

Establishing any licensing or registration requirement or imposing any charge, fee, or tax on transportation network companies, transportation network company operators, or personal vehicles;

Requiring a TNC driver to obtain a business license or any other type of similar authorization to operate within the jurisdiction; or

Subjecting transportation network companies to the city, town, or local entity’s rate, entry, operation, or other requirements; provided, however, that cities and towns may continue to impose excise taxes upon the legal owners of vehicles used to provide TNC services in a manner consistent with previous such taxation of private motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1.

39-14.2-19.
Airport Corporation Authority.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

39-14.2-18

, the Rhode Island airport corporation, or any successor entity authorized to oversee and control the property of Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport and any other state airport, shall have the authority to establish reasonable regulations governing transportation network company (TNC) operators offering TNC services on airport property through proper amendment of the corporation’s ground transportation rules or by entering into operating agreements with TNCs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 32, § 8, effective June 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 36, § 8, effective June 1, 2021.

39-14.2-20.
Business records to be maintained, retained by transportation network companies.

A TNC shall maintain individual trip records that detail the date, time, pick-up location, drop-off location, distance traveled, length of time of the trip, and total fare charged for every TNC service it coordinates in the state. Such records shall be maintained for a minimum of two (2) years from December 31 of the calendar year in which the services were rendered.

A TNC shall maintain detailed, TNC-operator records that include the dates and times the operator “logs into” and “logs out of” the TNC’s digital network, the number of TNC service trips the operator performs through the TNC’s digital network, and the total miles driven and fares collected. Additionally, the TNC shall maintain records of all passenger complaints lodged against each TNC operator and the results of any investigation or actions taken as a result of such complaints. Such records shall be maintained for a minimum of two (2) years from December 31 of the calendar year in which the services were rendered.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1.

39-14.2-21.
Anti-discrimination — Handicapped accessibility.

A transportation network company shall adopt a policy of nondiscrimination based on the rider’s race, color, national origin, religious belief or affiliation, gender, physical disability, age, sexual orientation/identity, gender identity, or the pick-up location or drop-off location requested by the rider. TNCs and TNC operators shall not impose any additional charge(s) for providing services in compliance with this section.

TNC drivers shall comply with all applicable laws regarding nondiscrimination against riders or potential riders on the basis of the rider’s race, color, national origin, religious belief or affiliation, gender, physical disability, age, sexual orientation/identity, gender identity, or the pick-up location or drop-off location requested by the rider.

TNC operators shall not deny or refuse service to any rider accompanied by a service animal, nor shall a TNC operator impose any additional charge for the transportation of any service animal accompanying a TNC rider. Service animals shall be allowed to accompany the TNC rider in the passenger compartment of the vehicle without any conditions or restrictions, so long as the animal does not impede the safe operation of the vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1.

39-14.2-22.
Penalties for violations by TNCs or TNC operators.

The administrator may impose civil sanctions upon any TNC or TNC operator subject to the applicable provisions of this chapter and/or any rules and regulations promulgated under it, who or that shall knowingly or willfully cause to be done any act prohibited by applicable sections of this chapter, or who or that shall be guilty of any violation of this chapter or the rules and regulations. The sanctions may include a civil penalty (fine) or the suspension or revocation of the TNC’s license.

If the division finds that a TNC has failed to comply with the provisions of §

39-14.2-7

, the division shall conduct an audit of an additional sample of TNC records as determined by the division.

Upon a TNC’s first violation of §

39-14.2-7

, the division shall fine the TNC five thousand dollars ($5,000). Upon any additional violations after a three-year (3) period during which the TNC has not violated § 39-14.2-7, the division shall fine the TNC seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500).

Upon a TNC’s second violation of § 39-14.2-7 within three (3) years, the division shall fine the TNC ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and shall require the TNC to produce a remediation plan to meet the requirements of § 39-14.2-7.

Upon a TNC’s third violation of § 39-14.2-7 within three (3) years, the division shall assume responsibility for implementing the provisions of § 39-14.2-7 on behalf of the TNC for at least six (6) months and until the TNC has provided a remediation plan and the division has determined that the TNC will successfully achieve full compliance with this chapter. At minimum, and subject to such other requirements as the division may establish by regulation, the division shall conduct required background checks for the TNC’s drivers. Any additional costs incurred by the division as a result of implementing this section shall be reimbursed by the TNC.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the division’s authority to fine TNCs or TNC drivers or suspend or revoke TNC licenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 367, § 1.